Utah statutes.
76-6-204.5.   Burglary of a railroad car -- Charge of other offenses.
(1)  Any person commits burglary of a railroad car when the person breaks the
lock or seal on any railroad car, with the intent to commit a felony or theft.
(2)  Burglary of a railroad car is a third degree felony.
(3)  Charging a person for a violation of Subsection (1) does not preclude
charging the person for any other offense.
